src/pron-lex.txt
!****************************************************************************
!  Na Forainmneacha Pearsanta 		- The Personal Pronouns (mé,tú, sé, sí..)
!  Na Forainmneacha Éiginnte 		- Indefinite Pronouns (ceachtar, cibé ...)
!
!  E. Uí Dhonnchadha
! 
! (1) New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers  
! (2) Gramadach na Gaeilge agus Litriú na Gaeilge - An Caighdeán Oifigiúil
! (3) Foclóir Póca - An Gúm
! (4) Nuachúrsa Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
! (5) Ó Dónaill Irish-English Dictionary
!
! Pronominals - words which act like pronouns
!****************************************************************************

Multichar_Symbols

+Pron		! Pronoun
+Pro		! Pronoun with Copula

+Prep		! Prepositional pronoun
+Pers		! Personal
+Emph		! Emphatic (Contrastive) form of personal pronoun 
+Ref		! Reflexive
+Idf		! Indefinite
+Dem		! Demonstrative
+Q		! Interrogative (restored 12/9/2013)
+Art		! (restored 12/9/2013)
+hPref		!
+1P +2P +3P	! first, second or third person
+Fem		! feminine gender
+Masc		! masculine gender

+Sg +Pl		! singular or plural in number


!!+VerbSubj	!  sí, sé and siad are used only when pron follows predicate verb in 
!! Subj is used for subjunctive
+Sbj	!  sí, sé and siad are used only when pron follows predicate verb in 
		!  subject position eg Chuaigh SÍ amach (She went out), 
		!  but Téigh gan Í (Go without her)
!!!+Obj		! obj pronoun
+CU 
+CM
+CC

+Cop
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Root
        Personal_Pronouns;
 
!***************************************************************************

LEXICON Emph_sa			! Broad: 1S & 2S & 3S(Fem) & 2P
+Emph:sa	#;
+Emph:-sa	#;
Demonstrative;

LEXICON Emph_se			! Slender: 1S & 2S & 3S(Fem) & 2P
+Emph:se	#;
+Emph:-se	#;
Demonstrative;

LEXICON Emph_san		! Broad: 3S(Masc) & 3P
+Emph:san	#;
+Emph:-san	#;
Demonstrative;

LEXICON Emph_sean		! Slender: 3S(Masc) & 3P
+Emph:sean	#;
+Emph:-sean	#;
Demonstrative;

LEXICON Emph_e			! Br/Sl: 1P
+Emph:e	#;
#;

!!! These demonstrative suffixes are used in historical text
!!! e.g. aici-sin, aici-seo etc. Only 3rd person??? sg and pl

LEXICON Demonstrative
+Dem:-sin	#;
+Dem:-seo	#;
#;

LEXICON Personal_Pronouns
sinn+Pron+Pers+1P+Pl+Sbj:sinn				Emph_e;	! we
muid+Pron+Pers+1P+Pl:muid					Emph_e;	! we
siad+Pron+Pers+3P+Pl+Sbj:siad			Emph_san;	! they/them
iad+Pron+Pers+3P+Pl:iad					Emph_san;	! they
ag+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:agam				Emph_sa;	! at me
ag+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:a'm				Emph_sa;	! at me
ag+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:agat				Emph_sa;	! at you
ag+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:a'at				Emph_sa;	! at you
ag+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:aige		Emph_sean;	! at him
ag+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:aici			Emph_se;	! at her
ag+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:againn			Emph_e;		! at us
ag+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:agaibh			Emph_se;	! at you
ag+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:acu				Emph_san;	! at them
ag+CC+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:acub			Emph_san;	! at them
ar+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:orm				Emph_sa;  	! on me
ar+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:ort				Emph_sa;  	! on you
ar+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:air			Emph_sean;  ! on him
ar+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc+hPref:hair			Emph_sean;  ! on him
ar+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:uirthi		Emph_se;  	! on her
ar+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:orainn			Emph_e;	  	! on us
ar+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:oraibh			Emph_se;  	! on you
ar+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:orthu			Emph_san;  	! on them
as+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:asam				Emph_sa;	! out of me
as+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:asat				Emph_sa;  	! out of you
as+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:as			Emph_san;  	! out of him
as+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:aisti		Emph_se;  	! out of her
as+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:asainn			Emph_e;  	! out of us
as+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:asaibh			Emph_se;  	! out of you
as+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:astu				Emph_san;	! out of them
chuig+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:chugam		Emph_sa;  	! to(wards) me
chuig+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:chugat		Emph_sa;	! to(wards) you
chuig+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:chuige	Emph_sean;  ! to(wards) him
chuig+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:chuici	Emph_se; 	! to(wards) her
chuig+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:chugainn		Emph_e;  	! to(wards) us
chuig+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:chugaibh		Emph_se;	! to(wards) you
chuig+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:chucu			Emph_san;	! to(wards) them
de+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:díom				Emph_sa;  	! from me
de+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:díot				Emph_sa;  	! from you
de+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:de			Emph_sean;  ! from him
de+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:di			Emph_se;  	! from her
de+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:dínn				Emph_e;  	! from us
de+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:díbh				Emph_se;  	! from you
de+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:díobh			Emph_san;  	! from them
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:daofa			Emph_san;  ! 
de+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg+Len:dhíom		Emph_sa;  	! from me
de+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg+Len:dhíot		Emph_sa;  	! from you
de+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc+Len:dhe		Emph_sean;  ! from him
de+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem+Len:dhi		Emph_se;  	! from her
de+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl+Len:dhínn		Emph_e;  	! from us
de+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl+Len:dhíbh		Emph_se;  	! from you
de+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl+Len:dhíobh		Emph_san;  	! from them
do+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:dom				Emph_sa;  	! to me
do+CU+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:domh			Emph_sa;  	! to me
do+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:duit				Emph_se;  	! to you
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:dó			Emph_san;  	! to him
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:di			Emph_se;  	! to her
do+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:dúinn			Emph_e;  	! to us
do+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:daoibh			Emph_se;  	! to you
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:dóibh			Emph_sean;  ! to them
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:dófa				Emph_sean;  ! to them
do+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg+Len:dhom				Emph_sa;  	! to me
do+CU+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg+Len:dhomh			Emph_sa;  	! to me
do+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg+Len:dhuit			Emph_se;  	! to you
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc+Len:dhó			Emph_san;  	! to him
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem+Len:dhi			Emph_se;  	! to her
do+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl+Len:dhúinn			Emph_e;  	! to us
do+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl+Len:dhaoibh			Emph_se;  	! to you
do+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl+Len:dhóibh			Emph_sean;  ! to them
faoi+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:fúm			Emph_sa;  	! under me
faoi+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:fút			Emph_sa;  	! under you
faoi+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:faoi		Emph_sean;  ! under him
faoi+CU+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:fá		Emph_san;  ! under him
faoi+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:fé		Emph_san;  ! under him
faoi+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:fúithi		Emph_se;  	! under her
faoi+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:fúithe		Emph_se;  	! under her
faoi+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:fúinn			Emph_e;  	! under us
faoi+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:fúibh			Emph_se;  	! under you
faoi+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:fúthu			Emph_san;  	! under them
fara+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:faram			Emph_sa;	!  as well as me
fara+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:farat			Emph_sa;	!  as well as you
fara+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:fairis	Emph_sean;	!  as well as her
fara+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:farae		Emph_sa;	!  as well as him
fara+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:farainn		Emph_e;		!  as well as us
fara+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:faraibh		Emph_se;	!  as well as you
fara+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:faru			Emph_san;	!  as well as them
i+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:ionam				Emph_sa;	!  in me
i+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:ionat				Emph_sa;	!  in you
i+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:ann			Emph_san;	!  in him
i+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:inti			Emph_se;	!  in her
i+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:ionainn			Emph_e;		!  in us
i+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:ionaibh			Emph_se;	!  in you
i+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:iontu				Emph_san;	!  in them
idir+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:eadrainn		Emph_e;		!  between us
idir+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:eadraibh		Emph_se;	!  between you
idir+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:eatarthu		Emph_san;	!  between them
ionsar+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:ionsorm			Emph_sa; 	!  to me i.e. in my direction
ionsar+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:ionsort			Emph_sa;	!  to you
ionsar+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:ionsair  	Emph_sean;	!  to him
ionsar+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:ionsuirthi	Emph_se;	!  to her
ionsar+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:ionsorainn		Emph_e;		!  to us
ionsar+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:ionsoraibh		Emph_se;	!  to you
ionsar+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:ionsorthu		Emph_san;	!  to them
le+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:liom				Emph_sa;	!  with me
le+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:leat				Emph_sa;	!  with you
le+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:leis		Emph_sean;	!  with his
le+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:léi			Emph_se;	!  with her
le+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:léithe			Emph_se;	!  with her
le+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:linn				Emph_e;		!  with us
le+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:libh				Emph_se;	!  with you
le+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:leo				Emph_san;	!  with them
le+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:leofa			Emph_san;	!  with them
ó+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:uaim				Emph_se;	!  from me
ó+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:uait 				Emph_se;	!  from you
ó+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:uaidh		Emph_sean;	!  from him
ó+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:uaithi		Emph_se;	!  from her
ó+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:uaithe		Emph_se;	!  from her
ó+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:uainn				Emph_e;		!  from us
ó+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:uaibh				Emph_se;	!  from you
ó+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:uathu				Emph_san;	!  from them
roimh+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:romham		Emph_sa;	!  from me
roimh+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:romhat		Emph_sa;	!  from you
roimh+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:roimhe	Emph_sean;	!  from him
roimh+CM+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:roimis	Emph_sean;	!  from him
roimh+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:roimpi	Emph_se;	!  from her
roimh+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:romhainn		Emph_e;		!  from us
roimh+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:romhaibh		Emph_se;	!  from you
roimh+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:rompu			Emph_san;	!  from them
seach+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:seacham		Emph_sa; 	!  other than me
seach+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:seachad		Emph_sa; 	!  other than you
seach+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:seacha	Emph_san; 	!  other than him
seach+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:seacha	Emph_sa; 	!  other than her
seach+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:seachainn		Emph_e; 	!  other than us
seach+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:seachaibh		Emph_se; 	!  other than you
seach+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:seacha		Emph_san; 	!  other than them
thar+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:tharam			Emph_sa; 	!  over me
thar+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:tharat			Emph_sa; 	!  over you
thar+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:thairis	Emph_sean; 	!  over him
thar+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:thairsti	Emph_se; 	!  over her
thar+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:tharainn		Emph_e; 	!  over us
thar+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:tharaibh		Emph_se; 	!  over you
thar+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:tharstu		Emph_san; 	!  over them
trí+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:tríom			Emph_sa; 	!  through me
trí+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:tríot			Emph_sa; 	!  through you
trí+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:tríd		Emph_sean; 	!  through him
trí+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem:tríthí		Emph_se; 	!  through her
trí+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:trínn			Emph_e; 	!  through us
trí+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:tríbh			Emph_se; 	!  through you
trí+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:tríothu			Emph_san; 	!  through them
um+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg:umam				Emph_sa; 	!  about me
um+Pron+Prep+2P+Sg:umat				Emph_sa; 	!  about you
um+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Masc:uime		Emph_sean; 	!  about him
um+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl:umainn			Emph_e; 	!  about us
um+Pron+Prep+2P+Pl:umaibh			Emph_se; 	!  about you
um+Pron+Prep+3P+Pl:umpu				Emph_san; 	!  about them
